Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,169
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Environmental Trust Act:

(1) Board means the Nebraska Environmental Trust Board; and

(2) Trust means the Nebraska Environmental Trust.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 46;

Laws 2000, LB 957, § 8.